Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5719SV (3) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2336 Section 1. Section 256.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 36. Submit to the general assembly and 3 governor, by October 1 of each year, a report identifying 4 each complaint or incident of antisemitism that occurred at 5 each community college, institution of higher education under 6 the control of the state board of regents, and public school 7 district from the prior academic year, and the findings and 8 outcomes of any investigations conducted, as reported by 9 each community college, institution of higher education, and 10 public school district. For the purposes of this subsection, 11 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 12 Sec. 2. Section 260C.14, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. Annually, by September 1, submit to the 15 state board of education a report identifying each complaint or 16 incident of antisemitism that occurred at the community college 17 from the prior academic year, and the findings and outcomes of 18 any investigations conducted. For purposes of this subsection, 19 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 20 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 260C.51 Antisemitism ââ discrimination 21 prohibited. 22 1. Each community college shall prohibit antisemitism. 23 Each community college shall treat harassment or discrimination 24 by an employee or student that is motivated by or includes 25 antisemitic intent, or harassment or discrimination against an 26 employee or student that is a result of the community collegeâs 27 policies and programs, in the same manner as any other form of 28 discrimination prohibited by federal or state law. 29 2. Each community college shall integrate into the 30 community collegeâs codes of conduct for students, faculty, 31 and other employees a policy prohibiting conduct that relates 32 to antisemitism, including harassment and discrimination 33 against Jewish people in violation of Tit. VI of the 34 federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, and 35 -1- LSB 5719SV (3) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2336 any antidiscrimination regulations adopted by the federal 1 department of education or the federal department of justice. 2 Sec. 4. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Direct the institutions of 5 higher education under its control to prohibit antisemitism. 6 Each institution shall treat harassment or discrimination 7 by an employee or student that is motivated by or includes 8 antisemitic intent, or harassment or discrimination against 9 an employee or student that is a result of the institutionâs 10 policies and programs, in the same manner as any other form of 11 discrimination prohibited by federal or state law. 12 b. Direct the institutions of higher education under its 13 control to integrate into the institutionâs codes of conduct 14 for students, faculty, and other employees a policy prohibiting 15 conduct that relates to antisemitism, including harassment and 16 discrimination against Jewish people in violation of Tit. VI 17 of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, 18 and any antidiscrimination regulations adopted by the federal 19 department of education or the federal department of justice. 20 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 262.93A Annual report on antisemitism. 21 The state board of regents shall submit to the state board of 22 education, by September 1 of each year, a report identifying 23 each complaint or incident of antisemitism that occurred 24 at each of the institutions of higher education under the 25 control of the board from the prior academic year, and the 26 findings and outcomes of any investigations conducted. The 27 board shall conduct an annual review of the policies of the 28 regents institutions related to antisemitic actions and speech, 29 and provide the findings of such review in the report. For 30 purposes of this section, âantisemitismâ means the same as 31 defined in section 216F.1. 32 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Annual report on antisemitism. 33 The board of directors of each public school district shall 34 report annually to the state board of education, by September 1 35 -2- LSB 5719SV (3) 91 mb/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 2336 of each year, a report identifying each complaint or incident 1 of antisemitism that occurred at the school district from 2 the prior academic year, and the findings and outcomes of 3 any investigations conducted. For purposes of this section, 4 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 5 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 279.90 Antisemitism ââ discrimination 6 prohibited. 7 1. Each school district shall prohibit antisemitism. Each 8 school district shall treat harassment or discrimination 9 by an employee or student that is motivated by or includes 10 antisemitic intent, or harassment or discrimination against an 11 employee or student that is a result of the school districtâs 12 policies and programs, in the same manner as any other form of 13 discrimination prohibited by federal or state law. 14 2. Each school district shall integrate into the school 15 districtâs codes of conduct for students, faculty, and 16 other employees a policy prohibiting conduct that relates 17 to antisemitism, including harassment and discrimination 18 against Jewish people in violation of Tit. VI of the 19 federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, and 20 any antidiscrimination regulations adopted by the federal 21 department of education or the federal department of justice. 22